vi: Tiêu chuẩn đế giày trượt tuyết: Alpine (ISO 5355); Alpine touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Lai/đa tiêu chuẩn; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Khác
ko: 스키 부츠 밑창 표준: 알파인(ISO 5355); 알파인 투어링(ISO 9523); 그립워크(ISO 23223); 하이브리드/멀티 규격; 테크(핀); 워크 투 라이드(WTR); 기타
pt-BR: Bota de esqui padrão da sola: Alpina (ISO 5355); Touring alpina (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Híbrido/multinorma; Tech (pino); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Outro
it: Standard della suola degli scarponi da sci: Alpino (ISO 5355); Sci alpinismo (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Ibrido/multi-norma; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Altro
bg-BG: Стандарт на подметката на ски обувките: Алпийски (ISO 5355); Алпийски туринг (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Хибриден/мултинорм; Tech (щифтов); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Друг
sk-SK: Štandardná podrážka lyžiarskych topánok: Zjazdové (ISO 5355); Skialpinistické (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hybridné/viacnormové; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Iné
lt-LT: Slidinėjimo batų pado standartas: Kalnų (ISO 5355); Kalnų turistiniai (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hibridinis / kelių normų; Smeigtukiniai („Tech“); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Kita
en: Ski boot sole standard: Alpine (ISO 5355); Alpine touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hybrid/multi-norm; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Other
el: Πρότυπο σόλας μπότας σκι: Αλπικό (ISO 5355); Αλπικό touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Υβριδικό/multi-norm; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Άλλο
pl: Standard podeszew butów narciarskich: Zjazdowe (ISO 5355); Skitourowe (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hybrydowe/wielonormowe; Tech (pinowe); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Inne
ja: スキーブーツソール規格: アルペン (ISO 5355); アルパンツーリング (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); ハイブリッド/マルチノーム; テック (ピン); Walk-to-ride (WTR); その他
da: Sålnorm for skistøvle: Alpin (ISO 5355); Alpintouring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hybrid/multinorm; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Andet
th: พื้นรองเท้าสกีมาตรฐาน: อัลไพน์ (ISO 5355); อัลไพน์ทัวร์ริง (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); ไฮบริด/หลายมาตรฐาน; เทค (พิน); Walk-to-ride (WTR); อื่นๆ
hu: Síbakancs talpszabványa: Alpesi (ISO 5355); Alpesi túra (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hibrid/többnormás; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Egyéb
sl-SI: Standard podplata smučarskega čevlja: Alpsko (ISO 5355); Turno smučanje (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hibridni/več standardov; Tech (zatiči); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Drugo
es: Estándar de suela de bota de esquí: Alpino (ISO 5355); Alpino de travesía (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Híbrido/multinorma; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Otro
sv: Pjäxstandard för skidsko: Alpin (ISO 5355); Alpin touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hybrid/multinorm; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Övrigt
fi: Hiihtokengän pohjan standardi: Alppi (ISO 5355); Alppivaellus (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hybridi/multi-norm; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Muu
pt-PT: Norma da sola da bota de esqui: Alpino (ISO 5355); Touring alpino (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Híbrido/multinorma; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Outro
zh-TW: 滑雪靴鞋底標準: 高山滑雪 (ISO 5355); 高山旅行滑雪 (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); 混合/多重標準; 科技 (插銷); 步行兼滑行 (WTR); 其他
hr-HR: Standardni potplat skijaških cipela: Alpski (ISO 5355); Alpski turni (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hibridni / višenormski; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Ostalo
cs: Standardní podrážka lyžařské boty: Sjezdové (ISO 5355); Skialpinistické (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hybridní / vícenormové; Pinové; Walk-to-ride (WTR); Jiný
zh-CN: 滑雪靴鞋底标准: 高山滑雪 (ISO 5355); 高山越野 (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); 混合/多重标准; 技术（销钉）; Walk-to-ride (WTR); 其他
nl: Skischoen zoolstandaard: Alpine (ISO 5355); Alpine touring (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hybride/multi-norm; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Overig
de: Standard der Skischuhsohle: Alpin (ISO 5355); Tourenski (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hybrid/Multi-Norm; Tech (Pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Andere
fr: Norme de semelle de chaussure de ski: Alpine (ISO 5355); Randonnée alpine (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hybride/multi-normes; Tech (à inserts); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Autre
nb: Standard skiskosåle: Alpint (ISO 5355); Alpint topptur (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hybrid/multi-norm; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Annet
ro-RO: Standard de talpă pentru clăpari de schi: Alpin (ISO 5355); Tură alpin (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hibrid/multi-normă; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Altul
ru: Стандарт подошвы лыжного ботинка: Горнолыжный стандарт (ISO 5355); Ски-тур (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Гибрид/мультистандарт; Tech (пиновые); Walk-to-Ride (WTR); Другое
tr: Kayak botu taban standardı: Alp disiplini (ISO 5355); Alp disiplini tur (ISO 9523); GripWalk (ISO 23223); Hibrit/çoklu norm; Tech (pin); Walk-to-ride (WTR); Diğer